Illinois, session 104th, HB3002.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of 5Marriage Act is amended by adding Section 108 as follows: 6    (750 ILCS 5/108 new)7    Sec. 108. Sealing of court file.8    (a) As used in this Section, "court file" means a court 9file created in a proceeding for dissolution of marriage, 10legal separation, or declaration of invalidity of marriage 11filed with the court.12    (b) Upon motion, a court may order that a court file, 13including the pleadings, or portions of the court file be 14placed under seal if the court finds that the action or 15portions of the court file are sufficiently without a basis in 16fact or law. This may include, but not be limited to, a lack of 17jurisdiction or that placing the court file or portions of it 18under seal is in the interests of justice, and that those 19interests are not outweighed by the public's interest in the 20court file.21    (c) Nothing in this Section allows for the sealing of a 22court file or any portion of a court file that pertains to 23whether any order of protection has previously been entered in   HB3002- 2 -LRB104 09834 JRC 19902 b1the proceeding or any other proceeding in which a party, a 2child of a party, or both, if relevant, has been designated as 3either a petitioner, respondent, or protected person.4    (d) Nothing in this Section allows for or may interfere 5with the payment of child support, income withholding for 6support, or the reporting of an entry of an order for support.